Georgia statutes. TITLE 5 Appeal And Error
Article 1 General Provisions

Cross references.

Right of appeal from cases in the justice of peace courts, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. VI, Sec. I, Para. V.

5-3-1.
Right of appeal from county courts and justice of the peace courts.

Reserved. Repealed by Ga. L. 1983, p. 884, § 4-2, effective July 1, 1983.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section was based on Orig. Code 1863, § 3529; Code 1868, § 3552; Ga. L. 1868, p. 131, § 2; Ga. L. 1871-72, p. 288, § 5; Ga. L. 1872, p. 40, § 1; Code 1873, § 3610a; Ga. L. 1874, p. 85, § 1; Code 1882, § 3610a; Civil Code 1895, § 4453; Civil Code 1910, § 4998; Code 1933, § 6-101.

5-3-2.
Right to appeal from probate courts; exception.

An appeal shall lie to the superior court from any decision made by the probate court, except an order appointing a temporary administrator.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this Code section, no appeal from the probate court to the superior court shall lie from any civil case in a probate court which is provided for by Article 6 of Chapter 9 of Title 15.

History.

Laws 1805, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 283; Laws 1823, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 497; Ga. L. 1851-52, p. 49, § 1; Ga. L. 1851-52, p. 91, § 19; Ga. L. 1859, p. 33, § 5; Code 1863, § 3530; Ga. L. 1866, p. 24, § 1; Code 1868, § 3553; Code 1873, § 3611; Code 1882, § 3611; Civil Code 1895, § 4454; Civil Code 1910, § 4999; Code 1933, § 6-201; Ga. L. 1972, p. 738, § 6; Ga. L. 1986, p. 982, § 1.

Cross references.

Exercise of judicial power, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. VI, Sec. I, Para. VI.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1986, p. 982, § 25, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that that Act would apply to all cases filed on or after July 1, 1986.

Law reviews.

For annual survey on trial practice and procedure, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 383 (1986).

5-3-3.
Persons by whom appeal may be entered generally; attorney’s authority to appeal to be in writing; dismissal for failure to file; ratification of unauthorized appeal.

An appeal may be entered by the plaintiff or defendant in person, or by his attorney at law or in fact and, if by the latter, he must be authorized in writing, which authority shall be filed in the court in which the case is pending at the time the appeal is entered; but if it is shown to the court that the authority exists, the court may allow a reasonable time to file the same. Upon failure to so file, the appeal shall be dismissed and execution shall issue without further order. If the authority is not filed within the time allowed, a ratification of an unauthorized appeal, if made in writing and filed in the clerk’s office before the next term of the court, shall render the appeal valid.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3535; Code 1868, § 3558; Code 1873, § 3615; Code 1882, § 3615; Civil Code 1895, § 4457; Civil Code 1910, § 5002; Code 1933, § 6-104.

5-3-4.
Appeal by one of several plaintiffs or defendants — Authorization and procedure generally.

When there is more than one party plaintiff or defendant, and one or more of the parties plaintiff or defendant desire to appeal, and the others refuse or fail to appeal, the party plaintiff or defendant desiring to appeal may enter an appeal in the manner provided by law.

History.

Laws 1839, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 500; Code 1863, § 3539; Code 1868, § 3562; Code 1873, § 3619; Code 1882, § 3619; Civil Code 1895, § 4461; Civil Code 1910, § 5006; Code 1933, § 6-110; Ga. L. 1995, p. 10, § 5.

5-3-5.
Appeal by one of several plaintiffs or defendants — Effect of judgment on appeal generally; recovery of damages awarded upon appeal.

Upon the appeal of either party plaintiff or defendant, as provided in Code Section 5-3-4, the whole record shall be taken up and all shall be bound by the final judgment; but, in case damages are awarded upon such appeal, the damages shall only be recovered against the party appealing and his security, if any, and not against the party failing or refusing to appeal.

History.

Laws 1839, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 500; Code 1863, § 3540; Code 1868, § 3563; Code 1873, § 3620; Code 1882, § 3620; Civil Code 1895, § 4462; Civil Code 1910, § 5007; Code 1933, § 6-111.

5-3-6.
Appeal by one of several plaintiffs or defendants — Liability and recourse of surety on judgment on appeal.

The security, if any, of the party appealing shall be bound for the judgment on the appeal; and, in case the security is compelled to pay off the debt or damages for which judgment is entered in the case, he shall have recourse only against the party for whom he became security.

History.

Laws 1823, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 498; Laws 1839, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 500; Code 1863, § 3541; Code 1868, § 3564; Code 1873, § 3621; Code 1882, § 3621; Civil Code 1895, § 4463; Civil Code 1910, § 5008; Code 1933, § 6-112.

Law reviews.

For survey article on constitutional law, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 53 (1982).

5-3-7.
Appeal suspends judgment; effect of dismissal or withdrawal of appeal.

An appeal shall suspend but not vacate a judgment and, if dismissed or withdrawn, the rights of all the parties shall be the same as if no appeal had been entered.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3549; Code 1868, § 3572; Code 1873, § 3628; Code 1882, § 3628; Civil Code 1895, § 4470; Civil Code 1910, § 5015; Code 1933, § 6-502.

Cross references.

Similar provisions regarding suspension of judgment by appeal, §

9-12-19

.

5-3-8.
Requirement of consent to withdrawal of appeal.

After an appeal has been entered, no person shall be allowed to withdraw the appeal without the consent of the adverse party.

History.

Laws 1799, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 495; Code 1863, § 3550; Code 1868, § 3573; Code 1873, § 3629; Code 1882, § 3629; Civil Code 1895, § 4471; Civil Code 1910, § 5016; Code 1933, § 6-503.